Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.095

Certification of bargaining representative—Cross-check.

(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, if only one employee organization is seeking certification as the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit for which there is no incumbent exclusive bargaining representative, the commission may determine the question concerning representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the employee organization's membership records or bargaining authorization cards against the employment records of the employer. A determination through a cross-check process may be made upon a showing of interest submitted in support of the exclusive bargaining representative by more than fifty percent of the employees. The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

(2) This section does not apply to those employees under RCW 41.56.026, 41.56.028, 41.56.029, and 41.56.510.

[ 2019 c 230 s 8.]